Alaska statutes. Title 17. Food and Drugs.
Article 1. Regulation of Manufacture, Distribution, Prescription, and Dispensing of Controlled Substances.

Collateral references. —

25 Am. Jur. 2d, Drugs and Controlled Substances, § 81 et seq.

Sec. 17.30.010.
Regulations. [Repealed, § 22 ch 146 SLA 1986.]

Sec. 17.30.020.
Registration requirements; inspections.

A person who manufactures, distributes, dispenses, or conducts research with a controlled substance in the state or who proposes to manufacture, distribute, or dispense a controlled substance in the state, shall comply with the registration requirements of 21 U.S.C. 811 — 830 (Controlled Substances Act), and the regulations adopted under those sections.

A person registered under federal law to manufacture, distribute, dispense, or conduct research with controlled substances in the state may possess, manufacture, distribute, dispense, or conduct research with those substances to the extent authorized by the person’s registration and in conformity with the other provisions of this chapter.

[Repealed, § 22 ch 146 SLA 1986.]

[Repealed, § 22 ch 146 SLA 1986.]

[Repealed, § 22 ch 146 SLA 1986.]

A peace officer may enter a registrant’s premises at reasonable times and in a reasonable manner to inspect the premises and records required to be maintained under federal law. An inspection may not extend to financial data, pricing data, or sales data, other than shipment data, unless the owner, operator, or agent in charge of the premises consents.

Upon request from a peace officer, a person who manufactures, distributes, dispenses, or conducts research with a controlled substance in the state shall provide evidence of current registration under 21 U.S.C. 811 — 830 (Controlled Substances Act) and the regulations adopted under those sections.

History.

(§ 4 ch 45 SLA 1982; am §§ 13 — 16, 22 ch 146 SLA 1986)

Cross references. —

For penalty for refusal of entry into a premises for an inspection authorized under this chapter, see AS

11.71.060(a)(3)

.

Secs. 17.30.030 — 17.30.050.
Registration; denial, revocation, and suspension of registration; order to show cause.

[Repealed, § 22 ch 146 SLA 1986.]

Sec. 17.30.060.
Records of registrants.

A person registered under federal law to manufacture, distribute, dispense, or conduct research with controlled substances in the state shall keep records and maintain inventories in conformance with the record keeping and inventory requirements of federal law.

History.

(§ 4 ch 45 SLA 1982; am § 17 ch 146 SLA 1986)

Cross references. —

For penalty for furnishing false or fraudulent information in or omitting material information from records required to be kept under this chapter, see AS

11.71.040(a)(8)

; for penalty for failure to make, keep, or furnish records required by this chapter, see AS

11.71.050(a)(3)

.

Sec. 17.30.070.
Order forms; prescriptions.

A controlled substance may be distributed by one registrant to another registrant only if the distribution is in accordance with federal requirements for order forms.

A controlled substance may not be dispensed by a practitioner other than in accordance with federal requirements regarding prescriptions for controlled substances.

If the classification of a controlled substance in a schedule set out in AS

11.71.140

—

11.71.190

is different from its corresponding classification under federal law, the requirements of (a) and (b) of this section are determined by the classification of the substance under federal law.

History.

(§ 4 ch 45 SLA 1982; am § 71 ch 6 SLA 1984)

Cross references. —

For penalty for failure to make, keep, or furnish order forms required under this chapter, see AS

11.71.050(a)(3)

.

Sec. 17.30.080.
Unlawful administration, prescription, and dispensation of controlled substances.

A controlled substance classified under federal law or in a schedule set out in AS

11.71.140

—

11.71.190

may not be administered, prescribed, dispensed, or distributed other than for a medical purpose.

A person who violates (a) of this section, or who otherwise manufactures, distributes, dispenses, or conducts research with a controlled substance in the state without fully complying with 21 U.S.C. 811 — 830 (Controlled Substances Act), and regulations adopted under those sections, is guilty of misconduct involving a controlled substance under AS

11.71.010

—

11.71.060

in the degree appropriate to the circumstances as described in those sections. Upon filing a complaint, information, presentment, or indictment charging a medical assistance provider with misconduct involving a controlled substance under AS

11.71.140

—

11.71.190

, the attorney general shall, in writing, notify the commissioner of health and social services of the filing.

Upon receiving a notice from the attorney general under (b) of this section, the commissioner of health and social services shall immediately undertake a review of all unpaid claims or requests for reimbursements attributable to services claimed to have been provided by the person charged.

In this section,

“claims” has the meaning given in AS

47.05.290

;

“medical assistance provider” has the meaning given in AS

47.05.290

;

“medical purpose” means a purpose that is solely medical as opposed to any other purpose, that is reasonably necessary for treatment of a person’s illness, injury, or physical or mental health, and that is provided by a practitioner while acting within the usual course of professional practice or research and in accordance with a standard of care generally recognized and accepted within the medical profession in the United States;

“practitioner” has the meaning given in AS

11.71.900

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 45 SLA 1982; am § 72 ch 6 SLA 1984; am § 18 ch 146 SLA 1986; am §§ 1, 2 ch 66 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2008, in subsection (b), “11.71.060” was substituted for “11.71.070” to reflect the 1991 repeal of AS

11.71.070

.

Sec. 17.30.090.
Sale or purchase of certain listed chemicals.

A seller, retailer, or vendor may not sell for personal use and a person may not purchase for personal use ephedrine base, pseudoephedrine base, or phenylpropanolamine base, as those terms are used in P.L. 109-177, 120 Stat. 192, unless that sale or purchase complies with and meets the requirements of P.L. 109-177, 120 Stat. 192, with regard to amounts, identification required, storage, access and availability, and logbooks. A seller, retailer, or vendor shall maintain the logbook for the period required under P.L. 109-177, 120 Stat. 192, and shall allow law enforcement officers access to the logbook. Each seller, retailer, and vendor shall provide training to the seller’s, retailer’s, or vendor’s employees and agents in the requirements of this section. The Department of Public Safety shall provide assistance and information to sellers, retailers, and vendors to meet the requirements of this section.

A seller, retailer, or vendor may not sell to a person under 16 years of age and a person under 16 years of age may not purchase a product or substance identified in (a) of this section.

Nothing in this section limits the authority of a seller, retailer, or vendor regulated by this section to report to a law enforcement agency or officer suspicious purchases of a chemical, product, or substance. A seller, retailer, or vendor is not liable in a civil action for release of information to a law enforcement agency concerning matters related to this section.

A seller, retailer, or vendor does not violate this section if the seller, retailer, or vendor proves by a preponderance of the evidence that the seller, retailer, or vendor

exercised the degree of care of a reasonable employer to ensure compliance with (a) — (c) of this section; and

determined that the employees and agents of the seller, retailer, or vendor had been notified of the requirements of this section by

securing each employee’s or agent’s written acknowledgment of notification of those requirements; or

making another appropriate determination.

A person who violates this section shall forfeit and pay to the state a civil penalty of not more than $10,000 for each violation.

History.

(§ 18 ch 53 SLA 2006)

Revisor’s notes. —

P.L. 109-177, 120 Stat. 192, cross-referenced in (a) of this section, is a reference to the “USA PATRIOT Improvement and Reauthorization Act of 2005.”
References to “ephedrine base, pseudoephedrine base, and phenylpropanolamine base” and related requirements described in (a) of this section appear in the Act’s Title VII, the short title of which is “Combat Methamphetamine Epidemic Act of 2005.”

Editor’s notes. —

Section 22, ch. 53, SLA 2006, provides that this section applies “to offenses committed on or after June 3, 2006.”

Public Law 109-177, title VII, the Combat Methamphetamine Epidemic Act of 2005, amended sections through Title 21, Chapter 13 of the U.S. Code, 21 U.S.C. 801 et seq.